North Carolina, session 2025, SB652.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 2 of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 163-3.5. Special election; change in party affiliation.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, if an elected or appointed member of
the General Assembly changes party affiliation during the member's term of office with more
than six months remaining on the member's term, that member's office shall be deemed vacated
and the vacancy shall automatically trigger a special election which shall be held within 90 days
from the date the member changed party affiliation. The State Board of Elections shall develop
the guidelines and procedures to be used in conducting the special election required by this
section, including reimbursement to the county board of elections for the actual cost involved in
administering the special election."
SECTION 2. Article 22A of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 163-278.16C. Request to return contribution; change in party affiliation.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any elected or appointed member of
the General Assembly who changes party affiliation as described in G.S. 163-3.5 shall return any
contributions made to the member's or candidate's campaign committee, as defined in
G.S. 163-278.38Z, during the most recent election cycle upon the request of the contributor. A
contribution refund under this section shall be made within 30 days from the date of the request."
*S652-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 652-First Edition